Arkansas, session 2025, HB1772.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 2, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
2-1-103. Vegetable garden protection — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "vegetable garden" means a plot of ground
or an elevated soil bed on residential property where vegetables, herbs,
fruits, flowers, pollinator plants, leafy greens, or other edible plants are
cultivated.
(b) The General Assembly intends to encourage and protect the
development of sustainable cultivation of vegetables and fruits at all levels
of production, including without limitation on residential property for
personal consumption or noncommercial sharing, as an important interest of
the state.
(c) A person may cultivate a vegetable garden on his or her own
private property or on the private property of another person with the
permission of the owner in any county, municipality, or other political
subdivision of this state.
(d)(1) A county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this
state shall not adopt an ordinance or regulation that prohibits a vegetable
garden on residential properties.
*CRH269*
03/12/2025 5:12:51 PM CRH269

HB1772
(2) Subdivision (d)(1) of this section does not prohibit the
adoption of a local ordinance or regulation that regulates certain specifics
impacting vegetable gardens, including without limitation the use of water
during drought conditions, fertilizer use, control of invasive species and
weeds, and reasonable size and location specifics related to permissible
vegetable garden locations including without limitation side yards or
backyards.





























03/12/2025 5:12:51 PM CRH269